Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-1,106
Grazing livestock; requirements.

A person who brings livestock into any county of this state for grazing purposes which are already branded shall provide the Nebraska Brand Committee with a statement of the brands of such livestock. Failure to comply with this section renders the violating person liable for all damages resulting from such failure.

Laws 1999, LB 778, § 37.